California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(E) A beneficiary with satisfactory immigration status, including a noncitizen that is lawfully present, who is eligible for only pregnancy-related Medi-Cal coverage and who received services through the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system prior to January 1, 2022, as identified by the department, but only through the end of the postpartum period.

(F) A beneficiary without satisfactory immigration status or who is unable to establish satisfactory immigration status as required by Section 14011.2, who is eligible for only pregnancy-related Medi-Cal coverage,
 excluding a beneficiary enrolled in the Medi-Cal Access Program described in Chapter 2 (commencing Section 15810) of Part 3.3.

(G) A non-dual-eligible beneficiary who is an Indian, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 438.14 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and who elects to forego voluntary enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(H) A non-dual-eligible beneficiary eligible on the basis of their receipt of services through a state foster care program, or eligible pursuant to Section 14005.28, who elects to forego voluntary enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan, except for a non-dual beneficiary described in this subparagraph who resides in a county that is authorized to operate COHS, as described in Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), or, effective January 1, 2025, in a county operating a Single Plan model of managed care established under
 Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3) and Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5). For the purpose of this subdivision, the following requirements shall apply to non-dual-eligible beneficiaries eligible on the basis of their receipt of services through a state foster care program, or eligible pursuant to Section 14005.28, who are transitioning to mandatory enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan in a county operating a Single Plan model of managed care:

(i) Medi-Cal managed care plans shall comply with the access requirements in Section 14197 and in accordance with All Plan Letter 23-001, any superseding all plan letter, and any related guidance.

(ii) The department shall use the Intercounty Transfer process as outlined in All County Welfare Directors Letter 18-02E to provide for immediate access to care and treatment services in the month of enrollment when a
 beneficiary moves from one county to another.

(iii) The department shall issue guidance with input from stakeholders, including county child welfare departments.

(I) A non-dual-eligible beneficiary enrolled with an entity with a contract with the department pursuant to the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE), as described in Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591).

(J) Any other non-dual-eligible beneficiary, as identified by the department, for whom federal law prohibits mandatory enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(K) A beneficiary residing in one of the Veterans’ Homes of California, as described in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1010) of Division 5 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(L) Commencing no sooner than January 1, 2027, and subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, a beneficiary without satisfactory immigration status or who is unable to establish satisfactory immigration status as required by Section 14011.2, who is eligible pursuant to Section 14007.8 for the full-scope of Medi-Cal benefits, and who is subject to the service limitations described in subdivisions (b), (c), and (k) of Section 14007.8.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, if the department standardizes those populations subject to mandatory enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan pursuant to subdivision (a), commencing January 1, 2023, and subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, a dual eligible beneficiary, except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) or paragraph (2) of this subdivision, shall be required to
 enroll, or shall continue to be required to enroll, in a Medi-Cal managed care plan for purposes of their receipt of covered Medi-Cal benefits.

(2) The following dual eligible beneficiary groups, as identified by the department, shall be exempt from mandatory enrollment in Medi-Cal managed care as described in paragraph (1):

(A) A dual eligible beneficiary made eligible on the basis of a share of cost, including, but not limited to, a dual eligible beneficiary residing in a county that is authorized to operate COHS, as described in Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), except for a dual eligible beneficiary who is eligible on the basis of their need for long-term care services with a share of cost, as determined by the department.

(B) A dual eligible beneficiary enrolled with an entity with a contract with
 the department pursuant to PACE as described in Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591).

(C) A dual eligible beneficiary enrolled with an entity with a Senior Care Action Network (SCAN) contract with the department.

(D) A dual eligible beneficiary who is an Indian, as defined in subsection (a) of Section 438.14 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and who elects to forego voluntary enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(E) A dual eligible beneficiary with HIV/AIDS who elects to forego voluntary enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(F) A dual eligible beneficiary eligible on the basis of their receipt of services through a state foster care program, or eligible pursuant to Section 14005.28, who elects to forego voluntary
 enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan, except for a dual beneficiary described in this subparagraph who resides in a county that is authorized to operate COHS, as described in Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), or, effective January 1, 2025, in a county operating a Single Plan model of managed care established under Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3) and Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5). For the purpose of this subdivision, the following requirements shall apply to non-dual-eligible beneficiaries eligible on the basis of their receipt of services through a state foster care program, or eligible pursuant to Section 14005.28, who are transitioning to mandatory enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan in a county operating a Single Plan model of managed care:

(i) Medi-Cal managed care plans shall comply with the access requirements in Section 14197 and in accordance with All Plan Letter 23-001, any
 superseding all plan letter, and any related guidance.

(ii) The department shall use the Intercounty Transfer process as outlined in All County Welfare Directors Letter 18-02E to provide for immediate access to care and treatment services in the month of enrollment when a beneficiary moves from one county to another.

(iii) The department shall issue guidance with input from stakeholders, including county child welfare departments.

(G) A dual eligible beneficiary residing in one of the Veterans’ Homes of California, as described in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1010) of Division 5 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(H) Any other dual eligible beneficiary, as identified by the department, for whom federal law prohibits mandatory enrollment in a
 Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(d) (1) This section shall not prohibit a Medi-Cal beneficiary from receiving covered benefits on a temporary basis through the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system pending enrollment into an individual Medi-Cal managed care plan in accordance with this section and the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(2) This section shall not prohibit certain Medi-Cal beneficiaries eligible for full-scope benefits under the Medi-Cal State plan, as identified by the department, from voluntarily enrolling in a Medi-Cal managed care plan, in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(e) (1) No later than January 1, 2023, in all non-County Organized Health System counties, in areas where a PACE plan is available, the PACE plan shall be presented as an
 enrollment option, included in enrollment materials, and made available to an applicable beneficiary whenever enrollment choices and options are presented. Outreach and enrollment materials shall enable a Medi-Cal beneficiary to understand what PACE provides, that, if eligible, they may be assessed for PACE eligibility and enroll in PACE, and how they can receive additional information and request to be assessed for PACE eligibility. A person meeting the age qualifications for PACE and who chooses PACE shall not be assigned to a Medi-Cal managed care plan for the lesser of 60 days or until they are assessed for eligibility for PACE and determined not to be eligible for PACE. A person enrolled in a PACE plan shall receive all Medicare and Medi-Cal services from the PACE plan pursuant to the three-way agreement between the PACE plan, the department, and the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(2) In areas of the state where a
 presentation on Medi-Cal managed care plan enrollment options is unavailable, the department, or its contracted vendor, shall provide informational, outreach, and enrollment materials about the PACE program.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Dual eligible beneficiary” means an individual 21 years of age or older who is enrolled for benefits under Medicare Part A (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395c et seq.) or Medicare Part B (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395j et seq.), or both, and is eligible for medical assistance under the Medi-Cal State Plan. For purposes of this article, “dual eligible beneficiary” shall include both a “full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary” and a “partial-benefit dual eligible beneficiary,” as those terms are defined in this subdivision.

(2) “Full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary”
 means an individual 21 years or older who is enrolled for benefits under Medicare Part A (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395c et seq.), Medicare Part B (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395j et seq.), and Medicare Part D (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-101), and is eligible for medical assistance under the Medi-Cal State Plan.

(3) “Non-dual-eligible beneficiary” means an individual eligible for medical assistance under the Medi-Cal State plan, as determined by the department, that is not eligible for benefits under Medicare Part A (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395c et seq.) or Medicare Part B (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395j et seq.).

(4) “Partial-benefit dual eligible beneficiary” means an individual 21 years of age or older who is enrolled for benefits under Medicare Part A (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395c et seq.), but not Medicare Part B (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395j et seq.), or who is enrolled for Medicare Part B (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395j et seq.), but not
 Medicare Part A (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395c et seq.), and is eligible for medical assistance under the Medi-Cal State Plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 90.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.201.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall standardize those applicable covered Medi-Cal benefits provided by Medi-Cal managed care plans under comprehensive risk contracts with the department on a statewide basis and across all models of Medi-Cal managed care in accordance with this section and the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing January 1, 2023, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, the department shall include, or continue to include, skilled nursing facility services as capitated benefits in the comprehensive risk contract with each Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(2) For contract periods from January
 1, 2023, to December 31, 2025, inclusive, during which paragraph (1) is implemented, each Medi-Cal managed care plan shall reimburse a network provider furnishing skilled nursing facility services to a Medi-Cal beneficiary enrolled in that plan, and each network provider of skilled nursing facility services shall accept the payment amount the network provider of skilled nursing facility services would be paid for those services in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system, as defined by the department in the Medi-Cal State Plan and guidance issued pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14184.102. For contract periods commencing on or after January 1, 2026, during which paragraph (1) is implemented, the department may elect to continue the payment requirement described in this paragraph, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102.

(3) For contract periods during which paragraph (1) is implemented, capitation rates paid by the department
 to a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall be actuarially sound and shall account for the payment levels described in paragraph (2) as applicable. The department may require Medi-Cal managed care plans and network providers of skilled nursing facility services to submit information that the department deems necessary to implement this subdivision, at the times and in the form and manner specified by the department.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing January 1, 2024, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, the department shall include, or continue to include, institutional long-term care services not described in subdivision (b) as capitated benefits in the comprehensive risk contract with each Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(2) For
 contract periods from January 1, 2024, to December 31, 2025, inclusive, during which paragraph (1) is implemented, each Medi-Cal managed care plan shall reimburse a network provider furnishing institutional long-term care services not described in subdivision (b) to a Medi-Cal beneficiary enrolled in that plan, and each network provider of institutional long-term care services not described in subdivision (b) shall accept the payment amount that the network provider of institutional long-term care services would be paid for those services in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system, as defined by the department in the Medi-Cal State Plan and guidance issued pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14184.102. For contract periods commencing on or after January 1, 2026, during which paragraph (1) is implemented, the department may elect to continue the payment requirement described in this paragraph,
 subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102.

(3) For contract periods during which paragraph (1) is implemented, capitation rates paid by the department to a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall be actuarially sound and shall account for the payment levels described in paragraph (2), as applicable. The department may require Medi-Cal managed care plans and network providers of institutional long-term care services to submit information that the department deems necessary to implement this subdivision, at the times and in the form and manner specified by the department.

(4) The department shall convene, in collaboration with the State Department of Developmental Services (DDS), a workgroup to address transition of intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled (ICF/DD)
 facilities, and Intermediate Care Facility for the Developmentally Disabled-Nursing (ICF/DD-N) and Intermediate Care Facility for the Developmentally Disabled-Habilitative (ICF/DD-H) Homes from the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system to the Medi-Cal managed care delivery system to ensure a smooth transition to CalAIM.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing January 1, 2022, the department shall include donor and recipient organ transplant surgeries, as described in Section 14132.69 and in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, and donor and recipient bone marrow transplants, as described in Section 14133.8 and in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, as capitated benefits in the comprehensive risk contract with each Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(2) For contract periods from January 1, 2022, to December 31, 2024, inclusive, during which paragraph (1) is
 implemented, each applicable Medi-Cal managed care plan shall reimburse a provider furnishing organ or bone marrow transplant surgeries to a Medi-Cal beneficiary enrolled in that plan, and each provider of organ or bone marrow transplant surgeries shall accept the payment amount that
 the provider of organ or bone marrow transplant surgeries would be paid for those services in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system, as defined by the department in the Medi-Cal State Plan and guidance issued pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14184.102. For contract periods commencing on or after January 1, 2025, during which paragraph (1) is implemented, the department may elect to continue the payment requirement described in this paragraph, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102.

(3) For contract periods during which paragraph (1) is implemented, capitation rates paid by the department to a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall be actuarially sound and shall account for the payment levels described in paragraph (2) as applicable. The department may require Medi-Cal managed care plans and providers of organ or bone marrow transplant surgeries to submit information
 that
 the department deems necessary to implement this subdivision, at the times and in the form and manner specified by the department.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing January 1, 2022, Community-Based Adult Services (CBAS) shall continue to be available as a capitated benefit for a qualified Medi-Cal beneficiary under a comprehensive risk contract with an applicable Medi-Cal managed care plan, in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(2) CBAS shall only be available as a covered Medi-Cal benefit for a qualified Medi-Cal beneficiary under a comprehensive risk contract with an applicable Medi-Cal managed care plan. Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are eligible for CBAS shall enroll in an applicable Medi-Cal managed care plan in order to receive those services, except for beneficiaries exempt from mandatory enrollment in a
 Medi-Cal managed care plan pursuant to the CalAIM Terms and Conditions and Section 14184.200.

(3) CBAS shall be delivered in accordance with applicable state and federal law, including, but not limited to, the federal home and community-based settings regulations set forth in Sections 441.301(c)(4), 441.530(a)(1), and 441.710(a)(1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and related subregulatory guidance and any amendment issued thereto.

(4) For contract periods during which paragraph (1) is implemented, each applicable Medi-Cal managed care plan shall reimburse a network provider furnishing CBAS to a Medi-Cal beneficiary enrolled in that plan, and each network provider of CBAS shall accept the payment amount that the network provider of CBAS would be paid for the
 service in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system, as defined by the department in guidance issued pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14184.102, unless the Medi-Cal managed plan and network provider mutually agree to reimbursement in a different amount.

(5) For contract periods during which paragraph (1) is implemented, capitation rates paid by the department to an applicable Medi-Cal managed care plan shall be actuarially sound and shall account for the payment levels described in paragraph (4) as applicable. The department may require applicable Medi-Cal managed care plans and network providers of CBAS to submit information the department deems necessary to implement this subdivision, at the times and in the form and manner specified by the department.

(6) (A) The
 department and the California Department of Aging shall, subject to an appropriation made by the Legislature, collaborate with the California Association for Adult Day Services, CBAS providers, and applicable Medi-Cal managed care plans, to understand CBAS center closures.

(B) On or before March 1, 2029, the department shall provide an update to the relevant budget and policy committees in the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on CBAS center closures, developed in consultation with the California Department of Aging, the California Association for Adult Day Services, CBAS providers, and applicable Medi-Cal managed care plans. The update shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(i) A summary of the department’s previous and planned engagement with the California Association for Adult Day Services and CBAS providers during the 2026–27 and 2027–28
 fiscal years focused on understanding potential options for addressing CBAS center closures, including administrative efficiencies and improvements for eligibility and claims issues.

(ii) Potential options to help mitigate CBAS center closures, administrative challenges, and eligibility and claims issues.

(iii) Any potential options identified that would require legislative action to implement.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, including, but not limited to, subdivision (a), the department may not transfer responsibility for specialty mental health services in the Counties of Sacramento and Solano from the Medi-Cal managed care plan responsible for those services on July 1, 2022, in those counties until no sooner than all of the following requirements have been met:

(1) The requirements of Section 14184.403 have been implemented.

(2) Each county and Medi-Cal managed care plan has submitted to the department a transition plan that contains provisions for continuity of care or the transfer of care.

(3) Notice has been provided to affected beneficiaries, including the ability of beneficiaries to request continuity of care pursuant to mental health and substance use disorder information notices issued by the department.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Comprehensive risk contract” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) “Institutional long-term care services” has the same meaning as set forth in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions and, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, includes at a minimum all of the following:

(A) Skilled nursing facility services.

(B) Subacute facility services.

(C) Pediatric subacute facility services.

(D) Intermediate care facility services.

(3) “Network provider” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 27.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.203.

(a) For contract periods commencing on or after January 1, 2026, the department may require each Medi-Cal managed care plan and each health plan subcontractor of a Medi-Cal managed care plan to be accredited by the National Committee for Quality Assurance, or an alternative entity pursuant to subdivision (c), in accordance with this section and the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(b) The department shall not use findings from the accreditation pursuant to subdivision (a) to certify or deem a Medi-Cal managed care plan’s compliance with applicable state and federal Medicaid requirements, except in the area of credentialing.

(c) If the department determines that a Medi-Cal managed care plan or an applicable health plan subcontractor thereof is unable to receive accreditation from the National Committee for Quality Assurance due to population size, the department may authorize alternate accreditation if the requirements applied are substantially similar to those applied pursuant to subdivision (a), as determined by the department.

(d) For purposes of this section, “subcontractor” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 402.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.204.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2023, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, the department shall implement the Population Health Management Program under the Medi-Cal managed care delivery system to improve health outcomes, care coordination, and efficiency through application of standardized health management requirements, in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(b) The department shall require each Medi-Cal managed care plan, after consultation with counties and other affected stakeholders, to develop and maintain a beneficiary-centered population health management program, which is a model of care and plan of action designed to address member
 health needs at all points along the continuum of care, as described in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(c) Each Medi-Cal managed care plan in the population health management program shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:

(1) Prioritize preventive and wellness services.

(2) Identify and assess beneficiary member risks and needs on an ongoing basis.

(3) Manage beneficiary member safety and outcomes during care transitions, across all applicable delivery systems and settings, through effective care coordination.

(4) Identify and mitigate social determinants of health and reduce health
 disparities or inequities.

(d) To support implementation of this section, the department shall develop and implement a Medi-Cal Population Health Management service that expands access to available medical, behavioral, and social service data and provides authorized entities access to necessary administrative and clinical data and information with respect to Medi-Cal beneficiaries across Medi-Cal delivery systems and other applicable public programs, as identified by the department. Data will be available at the individual member level and include the ability for bulk downloads for the purposes of population health analytics and clinical management by Medi-Cal managed care plans in support of the population health management activities described in subdivision (f).

(e) Population health management program components shall be developed in consultation with appropriate stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Public Health, Medi-Cal managed care plans, Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems, county public health and social services, providers, community-based organizations, and consumer advocates.

(f) The Population Health Management Program shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Appropriate use of preventive services for children and adults, and other interventions, including chronic disease management, referrals for behavioral and oral health care services, housing, nutrition, and other health-related social needs.

(2) Risk assessment is comparable and consistent between Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(3) Any algorithm used to conduct member risk assessment is comparable, standardized, and mitigated for racial and other biases through consideration of disease burden relative to utilization and other patient risk factors beyond cost and historical utilization. The department shall report the underlying measures it uses in its algorithm.

(4) Any screening tool used to assess beneficiaries is age appropriate and comparable across Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(5) Each Medi-Cal managed care plan incorporates the findings of its Population Needs Assessment in its population health management program.

(6) Each Medi-Cal managed care plan describes how it will incorporate preventive and wellness services in partnership with Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems, county public health and social services, providers, community-based organizations, and consumer advocates.

(g) Beginning no later than January 1, 2024, the department shall annually post an analysis of the Population Health
 Management Program on its internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 402.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.205.

(a) Subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, the department shall implement an enhanced care management (ECM) benefit designed to address the clinical and nonclinical needs on a whole-person-care basis for certain target populations of Medi-Cal beneficiaries enrolled in Medi-Cal managed care plans, in accordance with this section and the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(b) (1) Subject to the effective dates listed in subdivision (c), the ECM benefit shall be available on a statewide basis to an eligible Medi-Cal beneficiary who is enrolled in an applicable Medi-Cal managed care plan and who meets the criteria in the CalAIM
 Terms and Conditions for one or more target populations, as determined by the department. A Medi-Cal beneficiary is excluded from ECM while enrolled in a 1915(c) waiver or the Family Mosaic Project, or while receiving California Community Transitions (CCT) Money Follows the Person (MFTP) services. ECM shall be available to a qualifying dual eligible beneficiary, as described under Section 14184.200, except for a dual eligible beneficiary enrolled in a fully integrated program for members who are dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid, including Cal MediConnect during the duration of the demonstration authorized in Section 14132.275, Fully Integrated Dual Eligible Special Needs Plans (FIDE-SNPs), and the Programs of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE).

(2) ECM only shall be available as a covered Medi-Cal benefit under a
 comprehensive risk contract with a Medi-Cal managed care plan. A Medi-Cal beneficiary who is eligible for ECM shall enroll in a Medi-Cal managed care plan in order to receive those services.

(c) (1) A Medi-Cal managed care plan operating in counties in which either the Whole Person Care pilot program, pursuant to Section 14184.60, or the Health Home Program, pursuant to Article 3.9 (commencing with Section 14127), or both, were implemented, as determined by the department, shall be required to cover ECM under its comprehensive risk contract as follows:

(A) Commencing January 1, 2022, a Medi-Cal managed care plan described in this paragraph shall be required to cover ECM for existing target populations under either the Whole Person Care pilot program or the
 Health Home Program, or both, as identified by the department.

(B) (i) Commencing January 1, 2023, a Medi-Cal managed care plan described in this paragraph shall be required to cover ECM for other select target populations described in subdivision (d), as identified by the department and in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(ii) Commencing July 1, 2023, a Medi-Cal managed care plan described in this paragraph shall be required to cover ECM for all target populations described in subdivision (d) and in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(2) A Medi-Cal managed care plan operating in counties in which neither the Whole Person Care pilot program, pursuant to Section
 14184.60, or the Health Home Program, pursuant to Article 3.9 (commencing with Section 14127), was implemented, as determined by the department, shall be required to cover select ECM target populations, as identified by the department, under its comprehensive risk contract, commencing July 1, 2022. All other target populations, including the target population described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (d), shall be covered commencing January 1, 2023, or July 1, 2023, in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(d) Target populations shall include the following, consistent with the department’s eligibility criteria, and to the extent approved in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions:

(1) Children or youth with complex physical, behavioral, developmental, or oral health needs,
 including, but not limited to, those eligible for California Children’s Services, those involved or with a history of involvement in child welfare or the juvenile justice system, or youth with clinical high-risk syndrome or a first episode of psychosis.

(2) Individuals experiencing homelessness.

(3) High utilizers with frequent hospital admissions, short-term skilled nursing facility stays, or emergency room visits.

(4) Individuals at risk for institutionalization and eligible for long-term care services.

(5) Nursing facility residents who want to transition to the community.

(6) Individuals
 with serious mental illness (SMI), and children with serious emotional disturbance (SED) or substance use disorder (SUD).

(7) Individuals transitioning from incarceration requiring immediate transition of services to the community.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, for any time period in which a Medi-Cal beneficiary is eligible to receive ECM services through enrollment in their Medi-Cal managed care plan, the beneficiary shall not receive duplicative targeted case management services as described in Section 14132.44 or otherwise authorized in the Medi-Cal State Plan, as determined by the department.

(f) Medi-Cal managed plans shall consult and collaborate with Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems for the
 delivery of ECM for beneficiaries with an SMI, SED, or SUD.

(g) If a Medi-Cal managed care plan proposes to keep some level of ECM in house instead of contracting with direct providers, the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall demonstrate to the state that its ECM benefit is appropriately community based and shall provide a rationale for not contracting with existing providers.

(h) The department shall develop, in consultation with Medi-Cal managed care plans and other appropriate stakeholders, a monitoring plan and reporting template for the implementation of ECM pursuant to this section. The department shall annually publish a public report on reported ECM utilization data, populations served, and demographic data, stratified by age, sex, race, ethnicity, and languages spoken, to the
 extent statistically reliant data is available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 402.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.206.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2022, and subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, a Medi-Cal managed care plan may elect to cover those community supports approved by the department as cost effective and medically appropriate in the comprehensive risk contract that are in lieu of applicable Medi-Cal state plan services, in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(b) (1) Approved community supports pursuant to this section shall be available only to beneficiaries enrolled in a Medi-Cal managed care plan under a comprehensive risk contract, subject to paragraph (2).

(2) Approved community supports shall not supplant other covered Medi-Cal benefits that are not the
 responsibility of the Medi-Cal managed care plan under the comprehensive risk contract, including, but not limited to, in-home supportive services provided pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, and Sections 14132.95, 14132.952, and 14132.956.

(3) An enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiary shall not be required by their Medi-Cal managed care plan to use the community support.

(c) Subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, community supports that the department may approve include, but need not be limited to, all of the following when authorized by the department in the comprehensive risk contract with each Medi-Cal managed care plan and to the extent the department determines that the community support is a cost-effective and medically appropriate substitute for the applicable covered Medi-Cal benefit under the comprehensive risk contract:

(1) Housing transition navigation services.

(2) Housing deposits.

(3) Housing tenancy and sustaining services.

(4) Short-term post-hospitalization housing.

(5) Recuperative care or medical respite.

(6) Respite.

(7) Day habilitation programs.

(8) Nursing facility transition or diversion to assisted living facilities, including, but not limited to, residential care facilities for the elderly or adult residential facilities.

(9) Nursing
 facility transition to a home.

(10) Personal care and homemaker services.

(11) Environmental accessibility adaptations or home modifications.

(12) Medically supportive food and nutrition services, including medically tailored meals.

(13) Sobering centers.

(14) Asthma remediation.

(d) The department shall publicly post on its internet website a list of which community supports are offered to enrollees by each Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(e) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall provide information on the available community supports in its member handbook and plan
 website, including any limitations on community supports on the plan website.

(f) The department shall develop, in consultation with Medi-Cal managed care plans and other appropriate stakeholders, a monitoring plan and reporting template for the implementation of community supports pursuant to this section. The department shall annually publish a public report on reported community supports utilization data, populations served, and demographic data, stratified by age, sex, race, ethnicity, and languages spoken, to the extent statistically reliant data are available.

(g) The department shall conduct an independent evaluation of the effectiveness of community supports in accordance with the parameters and timeframes specified in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(h) The department shall take into account the
 utilization and actual cost of community supports in developing capitation rates.

(i) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Community supports” means those alternative services and settings approved in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions and administered according to paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 438.3 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) “Comprehensive risk contract” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 127.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.207.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2022, subject to appropriation by the Legislature in an applicable fiscal year and subdivision (f) of section 14184.102, the department shall make incentive payments available to qualifying Medi-Cal managed care plans that meet predefined milestones and metrics associated with implementation of applicable components of CalAIM, including, but not limited to, Sections 14184.205 and 14184.206, as determined by the department and in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(b) The department, in consultation with Medi-Cal managed care plans, consumer advocates, the Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery
 system, and other stakeholder representatives, shall establish the methodology, parameters, and eligibility criteria for incentive payments pursuant to this section. This shall include, but is not limited to, the milestones and metrics that Medi-Cal managed care plans must meet in order to receive an incentive payment pursuant to this section and the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(c) The department, in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, shall determine if a Medi-Cal managed care plan has earned an incentive payment, and the amount of that payment, for any relevant time period in which this section is implemented.

(d) Incentive payments pursuant to this section shall be made in accordance with the requirements for incentive
 arrangements described in Section 438.6(b)(2) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and any associated federal guidance.

(e) (1)   Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department may make additional or augmented incentive payments available to Medi-Cal managed care plans, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102 and to the extent sufficient nonfederal share funds are available for this purpose in each applicable CalAIM year.
